src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
    LEXICON V3B_ADel_IV
        +V+IV:      V3B_VerbMorf_ADel_Tones ;

LEXICON V3B_TV_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V3B@  V3B_TV ;

    LEXICON V3B_TV
        +V+TV:      V3B_VerbMorf_Tones ;

LEXICON V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart
    @P.VCLASS.V3B_ADelPart@  V3B_TV_ADelPart ;

    LEXICON V3B_TV_ADelPart
        +V+TV:      V3B_VerbMorf_Tones ;

LEXICON V3B_IV_VerbMorf/ADelPart
    @P.VCLASS.V3B_ADelPart@  V3B_IV ;

LEXICON V3B_DV_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V3B@  V3B_DV ;

    LEXICON V3B_DV
        +V+DV:      V3B_VerbMorf_Tones ;

!!  Apply post-root tones, and other root triggers

LEXICON V1_VerbMorf_Tones
    :%>                PostRoot ;
    :´%>               PostRootProg ;

    +Inf:%>i           FINAL ;

    +Der/V:%>id           NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
    +Der/V+Der/sho:%>asha      NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;

! oob and ow is handled further on for present.
LEXICON V1_VerbMorf_ow_oob_Tones
    +V:%>                  PostRoot ;
    +V:ob´%>               PostRootProg ;

    +V+Inf:ob%>i           FINAL ;
    +Der/V+Der/sho:ob%>asha        NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;

LEXICON MAGACOW_Tones
    +V:aa%>                  PostRoot ;
    +V:aab´%>               PostRootProg ;

    +V+Inf:aab%>i           FINAL ;
    +Der/V+Der/sho:aab%>asha        NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
    +Recit:ow             FINAL ;

LEXICON MUUSAW_Tones
    +V:aa%>                  PostRoot ;
    +V:aab´%>               PostRootProg ;

    +V+Inf:aab%>i           FINAL ;
    +Der/V+Der/sho:aab%>asha        NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
    +Recit:aw             FINAL ;



! inf:     1P       2P          INF
! -lan    -lmay    -lantay      -lmi
! -dub    -dbay    -dubtay      -dbi
! -ran    -rmay    -rantay      -rmi

! ran{-V}%>0 -> rm
! ran{-V}%>i -> rmi
! ran{-V}%>t -> rant

! etc.

LEXICON V1_VerbMorf_VDel_Tones
    :{-V}%>              PostRoot ;
    :{-V}´%>             PostRootProg ;
    +Inf:{-V}%>i         FINAL ;
    /Der+Der/sho:{-V}%>asha      NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
    ! TODO: furmasho? furanasho?

! TODO: Infinitive
! geli
LEXICON V2A_VerbMorf_Tones
    :{y}%>         PostRoot ;
    :´%>n%>       PostRootProg ;
    ! +V+Recit:%>       FINAL ;

    +Inf:%>n       FINAL ;
    ! How to work in infinitive with progressive here? +V:%>@V2B@

! sii
LEXICON V2A_VerbMorf_Tones/SII
    +V:{y}%>           PostRoot ;
    +V:´%>n%>         PostRootProg ;
    ! +V+Recit:%>       FINAL ;

    +V+Inf:%>n         FINAL ;

! samee, buuflee
LEXICON V2B_VerbMorf_Tones
    +Recit:ee%>           FINAL ;
    :e{e}%>           PostRoot ;
    +Use/NG:ay%>      PostRoot ;
    ! TODO: which is normative?
    :ey´%>n%>        PostRootProg ;
    :ay´%>n%>        PostRootProg ;

    +Inf:%>n          FINAL ;
    +Der/V+Der/sho:%>asha     NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;

! joogso, aammiinso, xusullayso
! TODO: wanaagsaneyn +Use/NG
LEXICON V3A_VerbMorf_Tones
    :%>                    PostRoot ;
    :´%>n%>               PostRootProg ;

    +Inf:%>n               FINAL ;
    +Der/V+Der/sho:{-a}%>asha     NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;

LEXICON V3B_VerbMorf_ADel_Tones
    :{a}                    V3B_VerbMorf_Tones ;

! TODO: -ow in lemma, ,-aaday, -aatay;
!  casow / casaaday casaatay

! weynow / weynaaday weynaatay
! TODO: imperatives?
LEXICON V3B_VerbMorf_OW_Tones
    +Recit:ow%>           FINAL ;
    :aa%>                  PostRoot/NoImperative ;
    :aa´%>n%>             PostRootProg ;
    +Inf:%>n               FINAL ;

    ! +Der/V:%>{N}sha        NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;

LEXICON V3B_VerbMorf_O_Tones
    :a%>                  PostRoot ;
    :a´%>n%>             PostRootProg ;
    +Inf:%>n               FINAL ;

    ! +Der/V:%>{N}sha        NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;


! wado, sigo, qubo, furto
LEXICON V3B_VerbMorf_Tones
    :%>                    PostRoot ;
    :´%>n%>               PostRootProg ;

    +Inf:%>n               FINAL ;

    +Der/V+Der/sho:%>{N}sha        NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;


! No flag diacritic for these, they go straight to adj inflections
LEXICON V4_IV_VerbMorf
    +V+IV+Der/A:%>   StatePerson ;
    +V+IV+Der/A:%>   FINAL ;

LEXICON V4_IV_VerbMorf_VDel
    +V+IV+Der/A:{-V}%>   StatePerson ;
    +V+IV+Der/A:{-V}%>   FINAL ;


LEXICON Progressive
    PostRootProg ;

LEXICON PostRoot

    SimplePerson ;
    ReducedPerson ;
    Imperative ;

    ! Invariable form for all persons
    PastNeg ;
    FINAL ;

    ! SemiReducedPerson ; ! Reduced+Nom paradigm

! Types like -ow- which have a special bare stem that is not present in the
! imperative need to go here.
LEXICON PostRoot/NoImperative

    SimplePerson ;
    ReducedPerson ;

    PastNeg ;
    FINAL ;


! TODO: check tones on imperative
LEXICON Imperative
! All verb types have bare imperative for sg pos
    +Imper+Sg:0     FINAL ;

    @R.VCLASS.V1@   Imperative_V1 ;
    @R.VCLASS.V1ow@ Imperative_V1 ;
    @R.VCLASS.V1ow2@ Imperative_V1 ;

    @R.VCLASS.V2A@  Imperative_V2A ;
    @R.VCLASS.V2B@  Imperative_V2B ;

    @R.VCLASS.V3A@  Imperative_V3A ;
    @R.VCLASS.V3B@  Imperative_V3B ;
    @R.VCLASS.V3B_ADel@  Imperative_V3B ;
    @R.VCLASS.V3B_ADelPart@  Imperative_V3B ;

LEXICON Imperative_V1
    +Imper+Pl:a                         FINAL ;
    +Imper+Neg+Sg:in´%>                FINAL ;
    +Imper+Neg+Pl:in´%>a               FINAL ;

! TODO: V2A Imperative
LEXICON Imperative_V2A
    !@R.VCLASS.V2A@+Imper+Sg:0 FINAL ;
    +Imper+Pl:a              FINAL   ;
    +Imper+Neg:i             FINAL   ;

! TODO: samée
LEXICON Imperative_V2B
    +Imper+Pl:ya             FINAL   ;
    +Imper+Neg:yn´%>        FINAL   ;
    +Imper+Neg:ynin´%>a     FINAL   ;

LEXICON Imperative_V3A
    +Imper+Pl:da             FINAL   ;
    +Imper+Neg+Sg:n´%>      FINAL   ;
    +Imper+Neg+Pl:nin´%>a   FINAL   ;

LEXICON Imperative_V3B
    !@R.VCLASS.V3B@+Imper+Sg:0 FINAL ;
    +Imper+Pl:ta              FINAL   ;
    +Imper+Neg+Sg:n´%>       FINAL   ;
    +Imper+Neg+Pl:nin´%>a    FINAL   ;

LEXICON PastNeg
    @R.VCLASS.V1@:i             PastNeg_iy ;
    @R.VCLASS.V1ow@:i           PastNeg_iy ;
    @R.VCLASS.V1ow2@:i           PastNeg_iy ;
    @R.VCLASS.V2A@:i            PastNeg_iy ;
    @R.VCLASS.V2B@:y            PastNeg_iy ;
    @R.VCLASS.V3A@:i            PastNeg_iy ;
    @R.VCLASS.V3B@:i            PastNeg_iy ;
    @R.VCLASS.V3B_ADel@:i            PastNeg_iy ;
    @R.VCLASS.V3B_ADelPart@:i            PastNeg_iy ;

LEXICON PastNeg_iy
    +1Sg+Ind+Past+Neg:n´             FINAL ;
    +2Sg+Ind+Past+Neg:n´             FINAL ;
    +3SgM+Ind+Past+Neg:n´            FINAL ;
    +3SgF+Ind+Past+Neg:n´            FINAL ;
    +1Pl+Ind+Past+Neg:n´             FINAL ;
    +2Pl+Ind+Past+Neg:n´             FINAL ;
    +3Pl+Ind+Past+Neg:n´             FINAL ;

! Recover from merged path with diacritics
LEXICON SimplePerson

    @R.VCLASS.V1@       SimplePersonMorph_V1 ;
    @R.VCLASS.V1ow@     SimplePersonMorph_V1/ow ;
    @R.VCLASS.V1ow2@     SimplePersonMorph_V1/ow2 ;
    @R.VCLASS.V2A@      SimplePersonMorph_V2A ;
    @R.VCLASS.V2B@      SimplePersonMorph_V2B ;
    @R.VCLASS.V3A@      SimplePersonMorph_V3A ;
    @R.VCLASS.V3B@      SimplePersonMorph_V3B ;
    @R.VCLASS.V3B_ADel@      SimplePersonMorph_V3B ;
    @R.VCLASS.V3B_ADelPart@      SimplePersonMorph_V3B/ADelPart ;

LEXICON ReducedPerson

    @R.VCLASS.V1@       ReducedPersonMorph_V1 ;
    @R.VCLASS.V1ow@     ReducedPersonMorph_V1/ow ;
    @R.VCLASS.V1ow2@     ReducedPersonMorph_V1/ow2 ;
    @R.VCLASS.V2A@      ReducedPersonMorph_V2A ;
    @R.VCLASS.V2B@      ReducedPersonMorph_V2B ;
    @R.VCLASS.V3A@      ReducedPersonMorph_V3A ;
    @R.VCLASS.V3B@      ReducedPersonMorph_V3B ;
    @R.VCLASS.V3B_ADel@      ReducedPersonMorph_V3B ;
    @R.VCLASS.V3B_ADelPart@      ReducedPersonMorph_V3B/ADelPart ;

! V1
!           keen-0-         keen-n-
!           keen-t-         keen-0-
!           keen-0-         keen-t-
!           keen-t-

! Note: person form B (2Sg, 3SgF, etc) is voiced after certain sounds.
