src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V3B
agabso:agabsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
amaaho:amaah V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
aruurso:aruursa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
awo:aw V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
baacso:baacsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
barko:barka V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
baybayso:baybaysa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
bidceyso:bidceysa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
bikaacso:bikaacsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
booqo:booq V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
buuxso:buuxsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
caashaqo:caashaq V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
cadayo:caday V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
calalso:calalsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
cararso:cararsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
cesho:cesha V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
codo:coda V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
daalaco:daalac V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
daandaanso:daandaansa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
daaqso:daaqsa V3B_DV_VerbMorf ;
dacayo:dacaya V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
daliisho:daliisha V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
dareenso:dareensa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
dawarso:dawarsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
dayo:day V3B_IV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
dayo:day V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
dhaafso:dhaafsa V3B_DV_VerbMorf ;
dhaasho:dhaasha V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
dhaawo:dhaaw V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
dhabar-garaaco:dhabar-garaac V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
dhabbaco:dhabbac V3B_IV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
dhabbaco:dhabbac V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
dhaqo:dhaq V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
dhayalso:dhayalsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
dhibso:dhibsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
dhogofso:dhogofsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
dibbaaqo:dibbaaq V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
didso:didsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
ducuumo:ducuuma V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
duufso:duufsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
ergo:erga V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
fidso:fidsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
fiiqo:fiiq V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
foofso:foofsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
fooldhaqo:fooldhaq V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
fuuqso:fuuqsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
gabro:gabra V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
garooco:garooc V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
garraarso:garraarsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
gasho:gasha V3B_DV_VerbMorf ;
gawraco:gawrac V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
go'aanso:go'aansa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
gowraco:gowrac V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
gudo:gud V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
guurso:guursa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
haldhacso:haldhacsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
heenso:heensa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
horjoogso:horjoogsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
ifso:ifsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
isticmaarso:isticmaarsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
jadeerwaco:jadeerwac V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
jeexo:jeex V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
jicsimo:jicsima V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
joolaalo:joolaala V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
juco:juc V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
kalabbaxso:kalabbaxsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
kawaano:kawaana V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
kufso:kufsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
le'o:le' V3B_IV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
lunso:lunsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
malooqo:malooq V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
maluuqo:maluuq V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
maraxso:maraxsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
masaxo:masax V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
mayraxso:mayraxsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
miiqo:miiq V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
miishmiisho:miishmiisha V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
miliilico:miliilic V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
mudo:muda V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
nintooxso:nintooxsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
qafilo:qafila V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
qararamso:qararamsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
qaydo:qayda V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
qurdudumso:qurdudumsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
raaco:raac V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
raagso:raagsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
riiqo:riiq V3B_IV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
riiqo:riiq V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
riixo:riix V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
rogobso:rogobsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
ruxo:rux V3B_IV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
ruxo:rux V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
saanaho:saanah V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
sahanso:sahansa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
saho:sah V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
saxiixo:saxiix V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
saxo:sax V3B_IV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
saxo:sax V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
shiilo:shiila V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
sibbaaqo:sibbaaq V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
silifso:silifsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
sooco:sooc V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
sunto:sunta V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
surbaco:surbac V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
taxo:tax V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
tiirso:tiirsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
tooxo:toox V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
tuunso:tuunsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
waaciidso:waaciidsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
warso:warsa V3B_DV_VerbMorf ;
weecso:weecsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
weydaarso:weydaarsa V3B_DV_VerbMorf ;
xanso:xansa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
xigso:xigsa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
xoqo:xoq V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
xusuuso:xusuusa V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
yu'o:yu' V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
